Georgia, session 2025_26, HB299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 7 of Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, regarding
landlord and tenant in general, is amended by repealing Code Section 44-7-19, relating to
restrictions on rent regulation by local governments, and designating said Code section as
reserved.
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 299
- 1 -